Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-351
Abuse, defined.

Abuse means any
knowing or intentional act on the part of a caregiver or any
other person which results in physical injury, unreasonable confinement, cruel
punishment, sexual abuse, or
sexual exploitation of a vulnerable adult.

Laws 1988, LB 463, § 4;

Laws 2012, LB1051, § 4.

Under the "evidence of abuse . . . or child abuse or neglect" provision of section 71-6903(3), the pregnant woman must establish that a parent or guardian, who occupies that role in relation to her at the time she files her petition for waiver of parental consent, has either abused her as defined in this section or subjected her to child abuse or neglect as defined in section 28-710. In re Petition of Anonymous 5, 286 Neb. 640, 838 N.W.2d 226 (2013).

Defendant's conviction of sexual abuse of a vulnerable adult reversed because evidence was insufficient to establish element of sexual contact. State v. Hulshizer, 245 Neb. 244, 512 N.W.2d 372 (1994).